Louisiana, session 2026, HB1089.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Chapter 25 of Title 6 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950,
comprised of R.S. 6:1431 through 1434, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
CHAPTER 25. CARE ACCOUNTS
§1431. Short title
This Chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "CARE Account Act".
§1432. Definitions
For the purpose of this Chapter, the following definitions apply:
(1) "CARE Account" or "Compensation Allocated for Reimbursable
Expenses Account" means a money market account for which the court has ordered
the deposit of funds from a special damages award allocated for the purpose of future
medical payments in a delictual action, except as provided for in R.S. 6:1434.
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-50 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 1089
(2) "Payor" means an insurer obligated by its policy to make payment on a
claim for which the court has ordered such payment to be deposited into a CARE
Account.
(3) "Qualifying medical expenses" mean amounts paid for medical care, as
defined in 26 U.S.C. 213, that are related to the injury or condition that is the subject
of the judgment.
§1433. Account deposits; disbursements; establishment and maintenance
A. In any delictual action, except as provided for in R.S. 6:1434, for which
the court awards special damages for future medical expenses, the court shall order
that the portion of the award allocated for future medical expenses be placed into a
CARE Account unless otherwise agreed to by the parties and approved by the court.
B. A CARE Account shall be established in the name of and owned by the
payor for the use and benefit of the plaintiff for the term of the plaintiff's life.
C. A CARE Account shall be established and maintained at a financial
institution as a money market deposit account, for which the financial institution
shall issue a transaction card for the plaintiff to execute transactions authorized
pursuant to this Chapter.
D.(1) Funds deposited in a CARE Account shall only be used for qualifying
medical expenses. However, the financial institution in which the CARE Account
is established has no duty to ensure transactions in the account are made for
qualifying medical expenses nor is the financial institution subject to liability for
transactions being effectuated that are not qualifying medical expenses.
(2) The payor may contract with a third-party administrator for services
including but not limited to monitoring and reconciling transactions involving a
CARE Account; however, the third-party administrator is not subject to liability if
the plaintiff executes a transaction that is not a qualifying medical expense.
E. Upon the judgment becoming final and the payor receiving an affidavit
from the plaintiff attesting to his knowledge and understanding that funds in the
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-50 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 1089
CARE Account shall only be used for qualifying medical expenses, the payor shall
deposit funds into the CARE Account as so ordered by the court.
F. One hundred eighty days after the financial institution receives notice or
otherwise becomes aware of the death of the plaintiff, the financial institution shall
close the CARE Account and any funds remaining in the account shall revert to each
payor in proportion to the amount each contributed to the account.
§1434. Excluded judgments
The provisions of this Chapter do not apply to the following actions:
(1) An intentional tort action.
(2) A medical malpractice action brought pursuant to R.S. 40:1231.1 et seq.
(3) An action involving sexual assault or sexual battery brought pursuant to
Civil Code Articles 2315.3, 2315.7, 2315.11, or 2315.13.
(4) An action for which special damages for future medical expenses would
otherwise be deposited into a Medicare Set Aside account as provided for by the
Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.
(5) An action subject to R.S. 13:5106 for which payments are made from the
Future Medical Care Fund provided for in R.S. 39:1533.2.
(6) An action in which there are no liable payors.
Section 2. The provisions of this Act shall have prospective application only and
shall not apply to causes of action filed prior to the effective date of this Act.
Section 3. The provisions of this Act shall become effective on January 1, 2027.